Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-102 Applicability of other laws.
(a) Part III of article 10A, and article 10H of chapter 431 shall apply to
nonprofit medical indemnity or hospital service associations. Such
associations shall be exempt from the provisions of part I of article 10A;
provided that such exemption is in compliance with applicable federal statutes
and regulations.

(b) Article 2, article 2D, parts II and IV of
article 3, article 6, part III of article 7, article 9A, article 13, article
14G, and article 15 of chapter 431, sections 431:3-301, 431:3-302, 431:3-303,
431:3-304, 431:3-305, and 431:10-102, and the powers granted by those
provisions to the commissioner, shall apply to managed care plans, health
maintenance organizations, or medical indemnity or hospital service
associations that are owned or controlled by mutual benefit societies so long
as the application in any particular case is in compliance with and is not
preempted by applicable federal statutes and regulations.

(c) The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 for the implementation and administration of this chapter. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 178, §3; am L 1999, c 93, §6; am L 2002, c
74, §§3, 6; am L 2003, c 3, §22; am L 2007, c 175, §3 and c 227, §2; am L 2011,
c 80, §7; am L 2012, c 251, §2; am L 2013, c 56, §1; am L 2015, c 63, §11]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next